bng.dix
		<pardef n="Cabi_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>guli</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>guli</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>gulike</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>gulira</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>we</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="we"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>guliwe</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="we"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>gulowe</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="we"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tA</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tAya</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ya"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ti</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tAke</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tike</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tAra</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ra</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inanim"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="aXikArI_n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>we</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/><s n="we"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>xera</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="xera"/><s n="anim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>jana</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="anim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>sakala</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="anim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>barga</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="anim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>rA</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>guliwe</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="anim"/><s n="we"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>gulowe</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="anim"/><s n="we"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ti</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tA</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tike</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tAke</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/><s n="ke"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>tira</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ra</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="anim"/><s n="ra"/></r></p></e>			
			<e><p><l>rA</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="anim"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
